Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2936
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the Convicted Sex Offender Act.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 89.